Louisiana, session 2026, HB408.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1333.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1333.1. Homeowner's insurance; insurer's nonrenewal restriction when homeowner
mitigates risk; insurer's nonrenewal notice requirements
A. An insurer shall not fail to renew a residential insurance policy when the
homeowner mitigates risk within ninety days of a notice from the insurer. A
homeowner mitigates risk when the homeowner resolves the reason for nonrenewal
contained in the notice from the insurer. The insurer shall not utilize such reasons
to increase the insured's rate or premium upon renewal.
B. An insurer shall notify the insured, in writing, of the reasons for
nonrenewal of the policy. The notice shall be delivered or mailed to the insured. For
purposes of this Subsection, "delivered" includes electronic transmittal, facsimile,
or personal delivery. Where written notice of nonrenewal is required and the insurer
elects to mail the notice, the running of the time period between the date of mailing
and the effective date of termination of coverage shall commence upon the date of
mailing.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-44 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 408